Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Chapter 3 Limitation of Actions
§ 1-3-118.
Right to commence new action.

If in an action commenced
in due time a judgment for the plaintiff is reversed, or if the plaintiff
fails otherwise than upon the merits and the time limited for the
commencement of the action has expired at the date of the reversal
or failure, the plaintiff, or his representatives if he dies and if
the cause of action survives, may commence a new action within one
(1) year after the date of the failure or reversal. This provision
also applies to any claim asserted in any pleading by a defendant.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 44; R.S. 1887, § 2380; R.S. 1899, § 3465; C.S. 1910, § 4309; C.S. 1920, § 5578; R.S. 1931, § 89-420; C.S. 1945, § 3-521; W.S. 1957, § 1-26; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to abatement of actions by death, see §

1-4-102

.

Section applies only where first action was commenced in due time.

Riley v. Union P. R. Co., 182 F.2d 765, 1950 U.S. App. LEXIS 2864 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1950).

Where public employee did not serve copies of her personal injury complaint on the state attorney general or the director of the department of employment in the manner required by Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 27-14-105(b) the complaint was barred by the statute of limitation, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-3-105

because service was not perfected until after expiration of the four year statute of limitations. However, the savings statute, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-3-118

, applied to allow the employee to refile the action.
Haney v. Cribbs, 2006 WY 158, 148 P.3d 1118,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 180

(Wyo. 2006).

And in Wyoming. —

This section does not apply to actions brought in a state other than Wyoming. Riley v. Union P. R. Co., 182 F.2d 765, 1950 U.S. App. LEXIS 2864 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1950).

Question whether original action sufficiently commenced. —

Where an amended petition showed that the time between the accrual of the cause of action and the filing of such petition exceeded the period of limitations, a demurrer (now motion) to the petition did not raise the question whether the summons issued on filing the original petition was a sufficient commencement of the action to entitle plaintiff to a new action within one year under this section. Columbia Sav. & Loan Ass'n v. Clause, 13 Wyo. 166, 78 P. 708,

1904 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(1904). See Rule 7, W.R.C.P.

No application to cases filed under the Wyoming Governmental
Claims Act. —

Where plaintiff's minivan was struck by a county road grader on October 31, 2007, plaintiff's complaint filed against the county on February 20, 2009 was barred by the one-year period of limitations for bringing an action under the Wyoming Governmental Claims Act; likewise, plaintiff's second complaint filed against the county on July 27, 2009 was time-barred. The Supreme Court of Wyoming held that the savings statute did not apply to actions filed under the WGCA.
Hall v. Park County, 2010 WY 124, 238 P.3d 580,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Wyo. 2010).

No exceptions for voluntary dismissals. —

Supreme court reversed the district court’s determination that the statute did not apply to dismissals without prejudice at the request of the plaintiff, and it reinstated a passenger’s suit against a driver because the statute was unambiguous and contained no “carve outs” or exceptions for voluntary dismissals; whether the passenger’s new action was substantially the same as the former and the measure of appropriate damages if he prevailed were questions to be determined in the district court. Hugus v. Reeder, 2022 WY 13, 503 P.3d 32,

2022 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 2022).

Inability to complete service. —

This section, the Wyoming savings statute, is designed for situations where the plaintiff files an action in a timely manner and makes a diligent good faith effort to serve the defendant but is unable to complete service within the 60-day time period of Rule 3(b), W.R.C.P., through no fault of his own. Rosa v. Cantrell, 705 F.2d 1208, 1982 U.S. App. LEXIS 23413 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1982), cert. denied, 464 U.S. 821, 104 S. Ct. 85, 78 L. Ed. 2d 94, 1983 U.S. LEXIS 1117 (U.S. 1983).

Improper joinder. —

Where service of process by the coroner was quashed because the sheriff was improperly joined as a party, a new action could be commenced under the provisions of this section within one year thereafter. Clause v. Columbia Sav. & Loan Ass'n, 16 Wyo. 450, 95 P. 54,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1908).

Federal court dismissal. —

This section affords a plaintiff a year from a federal court dismissal to commence a new action in the state court. Ball v. Renner, 54 F.3d 664, 1995 U.S. App. LEXIS 15055 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1995).

The one-year time frame in this section controls over the 30-day tolling period that 28 USCS § 1367(d) provides for dismissed supplemental claims where state law does not grant a longer tolling period. Ball v. Renner, 54 F.3d 664, 1995 U.S. App. LEXIS 15055 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1995).

Dismissal with prejudice as sanction for discovery violations. —

District court did not exceed its authority or violate the Wyoming Constitution's separation of powers provision by dismissing a passenger's second personal injury complaint in response to repeated discovery violations because the procedural rule authorizing the sanction of dismissal with prejudice for discovery violations was clearly within the district court's authority to control the course of litigation.
Reynolds v. Bonar, 2013 WY 144, 313 P.3d 501,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 2013).

Quoted

in

McAteer v. Stewart, 696 P.2d 72,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 456

(Wyo. 1985).

Cited

in

Terex Corp. v. Hough, 2002 WY 112, 50 P.3d 317,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 118

(Wyo. 2002); Bell v. Schell, 2004 WY 153, 101 P.3d 465,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 197

(2004); Roush v. State, 2014 WY 45,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Apr 8, 2014); Dirks v. Jimenez, 2015 WY 36,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Mar. 6, 2015).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Successive actions as within statutory provision fixing time within which new action may be commenced after nonsuit or judgment not on merits, 54 ALR2d 1229.

Statute permitting new action, after failure of original action timely commenced, as applicable where original action was filed in another state, 55 ALR2d 1038.

Determination of beginning of period allowed by statute for commencement of new action after failure, otherwise than on the merits, of action timely begun, 79 ALR2d 1270.

Voluntary dismissal or nonsuit as within provision of statute extending time for new action in case of dismissal or failure of original action otherwise than upon the merits, 79 ALR2d 1290.

Character or kind of action or proceeding within operation of statute which permits new action after expiration of period of limitation, upon failure of previous action commenced within the period, 79 ALR2d 1309.

Statute permitting new action after failure of original action commenced within period of limitation, as applicable in cases where original action fails for lack of jurisdiction, 6 ALR3d 1043.

Applicability, as affected by change in parties, of statute permitting commencement of new action within specified time after failure of prior action not on merits, 13 ALR3d 848.

Effect of statute permitting new action to be brought within specified period after failure of original action other than on the merits to limit period of limitations, 13 ALR3d 979.

Application to period of limitations fixed by contract of statute permitting new action to be brought within specified time after failure of prior action for cause other than on the merits, 16 ALR3d 452.

§ 1-3-119.
Effect of partial payment or new promise in writing.

When payment has been
made upon any demand founded on contract or a written acknowledgment
thereof, or promise to pay the same has been made and signed by the
party to be charged, the time for commencing an action runs from the
date of such payment, acknowledgment or promise.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 45; R.S. 1887, § 2381; R.S. 1899, § 3466; C.S. 1910, § 4310; C.S. 1920, § 5579; R.S. 1931, § 89-421; C.S. 1945, § 3-522; W.S. 1957, § 1-27; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

Propriety of suing upon original obligation. —

In action on note, it is proper to sue upon original obligation, relying upon a reply, after bar of statute of limitations has been alleged in defendant's answer, avoiding that bar through claim of acknowledgment of indebtedness. Investment & Sec. Co. v. Bunten, 56 Wyo. 77, 103 P.2d 414,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(1940). See Rule 7 and 8, W.R.C.P.

Promise to pay balance implied. —

Part payment takes action on debt out of statute of limitation, since promise to pay balance is implied. Smith v. Smith, 39 Wyo. 107, 270 P. 174,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. 1928).

Sufficient acknowledgment to revive debt. —

Letters which make excuses for nonpayment of a note and do not deny the obligation, nor regard indebtedness as nonexistent, are sufficient acknowledgment to revive the debt or claim otherwise barred by limitations. Investment & Sec. Co. v. Bunten, 56 Wyo. 77, 103 P.2d 414,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1940).

Statute of limitations was tolled by letter from property owner's attorney

to a contractor's attorney which acknowledged a debt clearly identifiable in the contractor's subsequent claim. Longstaff v. Mills, 773 P.2d 149,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 1989).

Circumstances of payment considered. —

Circumstances surrounding payments by brother to sister could be considered in determining whether payments were applicable to brother's note, relieving note of bar by limitations. Smith v. Smith, 39 Wyo. 107, 270 P. 174,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. 1928).

Maker's intentions not shown by endorsements. —

Maker's intentions in making payments are not shown by endorsement of payments on note in determining whether payments took note out of statute of limitations. Smith v. Smith, 39 Wyo. 107, 270 P. 174,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. 1928).

Effect of payment by comaker. —

A payment on a note by one of two jointly and severally liable thereon, made without the knowledge or consent of the other, does not suspend the running of the statute in favor of the other. Cowhick v. Shingle, 5 Wyo. 87, 37 P. 689,

1894 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1894).

Where one of two makers of a joint and several promissory note makes a payment thereon, so doing does not prevent running of the statute of limitations as to the other maker. Bergman v. Bly, 66 F. 40, 1895 U.S. App. LEXIS 2292 (8th Cir. Wyo. 1895).

Proceeds of foreclosure sale not deemed payment. —

The application of proceeds of a mortgage foreclosure sale on the mortgage note is not a payment which arrests the running of limitations within this section. Union Stockyards Nat'l Bank v. Maika, 16 Wyo. 141, 92 P. 619,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 1907).

Cited

in

NuHome Invs., LLC v. Weller, 2003 WY 171, 81 P.3d 940,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 207

(Wyo. 2003).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Moral obligation to pay barred debt as consideration for a new promise, 8 ALR2d 787.

Entry or endorsement by creditor on note, bond or other obligation as evidence of part payment which will toll the statute of limitations, 23 ALR2d 1331.

Acknowledgment or promise to pay judgment as affecting running of statute of limitations, 45 ALR2d 967.

Acknowledgment, new promise or part payment as affecting running of limitations on account stated, 51 ALR2d 331.

Payment by 1 of 2 or more joint or several debtors as suspending or tolling limitations, 74 ALR2d 1287.

Acceptance of past due interest, default in payment of which accelerates maturity of note or mortgage, as suspending the running of limitations, 97 ALR2d 997.

Necessity and sufficiency, in order to toll statute of limitations as to debt, of statement of amount of debt in acknowledgment or new promise to pay, 21 ALR4th 1121.

When statute of limitations commences to run against promise to pay debt “when able,” “when convenient,” or the like, 67 ALR5th 479.